Utah statutes.
34A-2-420.   Continuing jurisdiction of commission -- No authority to change
statutes of limitation -- Authority to destroy records -- Interest on award --
Authority to approve final settlement claims.
(1) (a)  The powers and jurisdiction of the commission over each case shall be
continuing.
(b)  After notice and hearing, the Division of Adjudication, commissioner, or
Appeals Board in accordance with Part 8, Adjudication, may from time to time
modify or change a former finding or order of the commission.
(c)  This section may not be interpreted as modifying in any respect the
statutes of limitations contained in other sections of this chapter or Chapter
3, Utah Occupational Disease Act.
(d)  The commission may not in any respect change the statutes of limitation
referred to in Subsection (1)(c).
(2)  Records pertaining to cases that have been closed and inactive for 10
years, other than cases of total permanent disability or cases in which a
claim has been filed as in Section 34A-2-417, may be destroyed at the
discretion of the commission.
(3)  Awards made by a final order of the commission shall include interest at
the rate of 8% per annum from the date when each benefit payment would have
otherwise become due and payable.
(4)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1) and Section 34A-2-108, an administrative
law judge shall review and may approve the agreement of the parties to enter
into a full and final:
(a)  compromise settlement of disputed medical, disability, or death benefit
entitlements under this chapter or Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act;
or
(b)  commutation and settlement of reasonable future medical, disability, or
death benefit entitlements under this chapter or Chapter 3 by means of a lump
sum payment, structured settlement, or other appropriate payout.
